Florida, session 2026, HB81.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Part XII of chapter 400, Florida Statutes,
consisting of ss. 400.9991 through 400.9998, Florida Statutes,
is created and entitled "Postsurgical Recovery Home Safety Act."
Section 2. Section 400.9991, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
400.9991 Short title.—Sections 400.9991-400.9998 may be
cited as the "Postsurgical Recovery Home Safety Act."
Section 3. Section 400.9992, Florida Statutes, is created
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb81-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 81 2026
to read:
400.9992 Legislative findings and intent.—The Legislature
finds that unregulated facilities providing care to patients
recovering from surgical or medical procedures present risks to
patient safety, health, and well-being. It is the intent of the
Legislature to establish clear standards, licensing
requirements, and oversight for such facilities to ensure the
safe recovery of patients and to prevent confusion with
addiction recovery residences.
Section 4. Section 400.9993, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
400.9993 Definitions.—As used in this part, the term:
(1) "Agency" means the Agency for Health Care
Administration.
(2) "Patient" means an individual admitted to a
postsurgical recovery home following a medical or surgical
procedure.
(3) "Postsurgical recovery home" means a licensed
residential facility providing short-term, nonacute care and
support to patients recovering from surgical or medical
procedures, that is staffed with licensed healthcare
professionals.
(4) "Recovery plan" means a written care plan developed in
coordination with the patient's surgeon or medical provider
outlining necessary postoperative care.
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb81-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 81 2026
Section 5. Section 400.9994, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
400.9994 Licensure.—
(1) A person or an entity must be licensed by the agency
to operate a postsurgical recovery home.
(2) An applicant for licensure must submit all of the
following:
(a) Proof of compliance with all facility safety
standards.
(b) Criminal background checks for all owners and staff.
(c) Proof of general liability and medical malpractice
insurance.
(3) The agency shall inspect each postsurgical recovery
home before issuing a license and annually thereafter.
Section 6. Section 400.9995, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
400.9995 Minimum standards for postsurgical recovery
homes.—
(1)(a) At least one licensed practical nurse or registered
nurse must be onsite or on-call 24 hours a day, 7 days a week.
(b) All staff must be trained in cardiopulmonary
resuscitation, basic wound care, and postoperative care
procedures.
(2) The ratio of staff-to-patients must be maintained as
follows:
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb81-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 81 2026
(a) Daytime: 1 to 8.
(b) Nighttime: 1 to 6.
(3) Facility safety standards must include all of the
following:
(a) Patient rooms and bathrooms must comply with the
Americans with Disabilities Act.
(b) Emergency power supply for critical equipment.
(c) Proper disposal of medical waste.
(4) Each facility must maintain:
(a) Written hurricane evacuation and disaster response
plans.
(b) Contracts with nearby hospitals for emergency
transfers.
(5) Each facility shall provide a patient, the patient's
family, or any other person acting on behalf of the patient
with:
(a) A written service agreement before admission.
(b) Access to a copy of the recovery plan.
(c) The visitor access policy to prevent isolation.
Section 7. Section 400.9996, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
400.9996 Prohibited acts.—It is unlawful to:
(1) Operate a postsurgical recovery home without a
license.
100 (2) Advertise a facility as a postsurgical recovery home
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb81-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 81 2026
101 without a license.
102 (3) Provide patient care without adequately trained on-
103 duty staff.
104 Section 8. Section 400.9997, Florida Statutes, is created
105 to read:
106 400.9997 Penalties.—
107 (1) Any person or entity that violates this part is
108 subject to:
109 (a) A civil fine of up to $10,000 per violation.
110 (b) Immediate suspension or revocation of license.
111 (2) Any person or entity that operates a postsurgical
112 recovery home without a license commits a felony of the third
113 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s.
114 775.084.
115 Section 9. Section 400.9998, Florida Statutes, is created
116 to read:
117 400.9998 Rulemaking.—The agency shall adopt necessary
118 rules to implement this part, including, but not limited to,
119 licensing application and renewal procedures, inspection
120 protocols, and training standards for staff.
121 Section 10. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb81-00